California statutes. Labor Code
(f) (1) Within five days after the board certifies a labor organization through a majority support election, any person may file with the board a petition objecting to the certification on one or more of the following grounds:

(A) Allegations in the Majority Support Petition were false.

(B) The board improperly determined the geographical scope of the bargaining unit.

(C) The majority support election was conducted improperly.

(D) Improper conduct affected the results of the majority support election.

(2) Upon receipt of a petition objecting to certification, the board may administratively rule on the petitioner’s objections or may choose to conduct a hearing to rule on the petitioner’s objections. If the board decides to conduct a hearing on the objections, it shall mail a notice of the time and place of the hearing to the petitioner and the labor organization whose certification is being challenged. The board shall conduct the hearing within 14 days of the
 filing of an objection, unless an extension is agreed to by the labor organization. If the board finds at the hearing that any of the allegations in the petition of the grounds set forth in paragraph (1) are true, the board shall revoke the certification issued under subdivision (e).

(3) The filing of a petition objecting to a majority support election certification shall not diminish the duty to bargain or delay the running of the 90-day period or 60-day period set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 1164.

(g) The board shall not permit the filing of any other election petition once a Majority Support Petition is filed until the board determines whether the labor organization filing the Majority Support Petition should be certified.

(h) Once a labor organization has filed a Majority Support Petition, no other
 Majority Support Petition shall be considered by the board with the same agricultural employer until the board determines whether the labor organization that filed the pending Majority Support Petition should be certified. However, the board may consider a second Majority Support Petition if the second petition alleges that the first petition was filed because of the employer’s unlawful assistance, support, creation, or domination of the labor organization that filed the first petition. In those cases, the board shall expedite its investigation of the matter and render a decision on certification within three months of the filing of the first petition. If the board finds that a labor organization was unlawfully assisted, supported, created, or dominated by an employer, that labor organization’s petition shall be dismissed and the second petition shall be considered. A labor peace agreement shall not be deemed unlawful by virtue of the fact that it was entered into pursuant to Section 26051.5 of the Business
 and Professions Code. Any labor organization that has been illegally assisted, supported, or dominated by an employer shall be disqualified from filing any further petitions with the board for a period of one year. That labor organization’s representatives, agents, or officers shall similarly be disqualified from filing any further petitions with the board for a period of one year. A labor organization assisted, supported, created, or dominated by an employer, along with its representatives, agents, or officers, shall be permanently barred from filing any further petitions.

(i) In any case where two or more labor organizations are seeking to represent the same bargaining unit through a Majority Support Petition, the most recent proof of support shall prevail.

(j) If an employer commits an unfair labor practice or misconduct, including vote suppression, during a labor
 organization’s Majority Support Petition campaign, and the employer’s unfair labor practice or misconduct would render slight the chances of a new majority support campaign reflecting the free and fair choice of employees, the labor organization shall be certified by the board as the exclusive bargaining representative for the bargaining unit. For purposes of a finding of an unfair labor practice or misconduct under this part and under this section, a misrepresentation of fact or law by an employer, an employer’s representative, or agent is an unfair labor practice or misconduct whether or not a labor organization has had an opportunity to respond to or correct the misrepresentation.

(k) If an employer disciplines, suspends, demotes, lays off, terminates, or otherwise takes adverse action against a worker during a labor organization’s Majority Support Petition campaign, there shall be a presumption that the adverse action was retaliatory. The
 employer may rebut the presumption if they can provide clear and convincing evidence that the adverse action would have been taken in the absence of the Majority Support Petition campaign.

(l) For purposes of Section 1156.5, a certification through Majority Support Petition is a valid election.

(m) The number of Majority Support Petitions that result in the certification of a labor organization conducted under this part shall be limited to 75 certifications through January 1, 2028.

(n) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 7, Sec. 9.   (AB 113)   Effective May 15, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1156.4.

Recognizing that agriculture is a seasonal occupation for a majority of agricultural employees, and wishing to provide the fullest scope for employees’ enjoyment of the rights included in this part, the board shall not consider a representation petition or a petition to decertify as timely filed unless the employer’s payroll reflects 50 percent of the peak agricultural employment for such employer for the current calendar year for the payroll period immediately preceding the filing of the petition.

In this connection, the peak agricultural employment for the prior season shall alone not be a basis for such determination, but rather the board shall estimate peak employment on the basis of acreage and crop statistics which shall be applied uniformly throughout the State of California and upon all other relevant data.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1156.5.

(a) The board shall not direct an election or conduct a review of any majority support petition in any bargaining unit where a valid election has been held or majority support petition has been reviewed by the board in the immediately preceding 12-month period.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 7, Sec. 10.   (AB 113)   Effective May 15, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 11 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1156.5.

(a) The board shall not direct an election in any bargaining unit where a valid election has been held in the immediately preceding 12-month period. 

(b) This section shall be operative January 1, 2028.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 10) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 7, Sec. 11.   (AB 113)   Effective May 15, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1156.6.

The board shall not direct an election in any bargaining unit which is represented by a labor organization that has been certified within the immediately preceding 12-month period or whose certification has been extended pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1155.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1156.7.

(a) No collective-bargaining agreement executed prior to the effective date of this chapter shall bar a petition for an election.

(b) A collective-bargaining agreement executed by an employer and a labor organization certified as the exclusive bargaining representative of his employees pursuant to this chapter shall be a bar to a petition for an election among such employees for the term of the agreement, but in any event such bar shall not exceed three years, provided that both the following conditions are met:

(1) The agreement is in writing and executed by all parties thereto.

(2) It incorporates the substantive terms and conditions of employment of such employees.

(c) Upon the filing with the board by an employee or group of employees of a petition signed by 30 percent or more of the agricultural employees in a bargaining unit represented by a certified labor organization which is a party to a valid collective-bargaining agreement, requesting that such labor organization be decertified, the board shall conduct an election by secret ballot pursuant to the applicable provisions of this chapter, and shall certify the results to such labor organization and employer.

However, such a petition shall not be deemed timely unless it is filed during the year preceding the expiration of a collective-bargaining agreement which would otherwise bar the holding of an election, and when the number of agricultural employees is not less than 50 percent of the employer’s peak agricultural employment for the current calendar year.

(d) Upon the filing with the board of a signed petition by an agricultural employee or group of agricultural employees, or any individual or labor organization acting in their behalf, accompanied by authorization cards signed by a majority of the employees in an appropriate bargaining unit, and alleging all the conditions of paragraphs (1), (2), and (3), the board shall immediately investigate such petition and, if it has reasonable cause to believe that a bona fide question of representation exists, it shall direct an election by secret ballot pursuant to the applicable provisions of this chapter:

(1) That the number of agricultural employees currently employed by the employer named in the petition, as determined from his payroll immediately preceding the filing of the petition, is not less than 50 percent of his peak agricultural employment for the current calendar year.

(2) That no valid election pursuant to this section has been conducted among the agricultural employees of the employer named in the petition within the 12 months immediately preceding the filing thereof.

(3) That a labor organization, certified for an appropriate unit, has a collective-bargaining agreement with the employer which would otherwise bar the holding of an election and that this agreement will expire within the next 12 months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1157.

(a) All agricultural employees of the employer whose names appear on the payroll applicable to the payroll period immediately preceding the filing of a petition under this chapter shall be eligible to vote or have their submitted authorization card or other proof of support deemed valid. An economic striker shall be eligible to vote or have their authorization card or other proof of support deemed valid under such regulations as the board shall find are consistent with the purposes and provisions of this part in any election or certification proceeding, provided that the striker who has been permanently replaced shall not be eligible to vote in any election conducted more than 12 months after the commencement of the strike or to submit an authorization card or other proof of support after this time.

 (b) In the case of elections conducted within 18 months of the effective date of this part which involve labor disputes which commenced prior to such effective date, the board shall have the jurisdiction to adopt fair, equitable, and appropriate eligibility rules, which shall effectuate the policies of this part, with respect to the eligibility of economic strikers who were paid for work performed or for paid vacation during the payroll period immediately preceding the expiration of a collective-bargaining agreement or the commencement of a strike; provided, however, that in no event
 shall the board afford eligibility to any such striker who has not performed any services for the employer during the 36-month period immediately preceding the effective date of this part.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 7, Sec. 12.   (AB 113)   Effective May 15, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 13 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1157.

(a) All agricultural employees of the employer whose names appear on the payroll applicable to the payroll period immediately preceding the filing of the petition of such an election shall be eligible to vote. An economic striker shall be eligible to vote under such regulations as the board shall find are consistent with the purposes and provisions of this part in any election, provided that the striker who has been permanently replaced shall not be eligible to vote in any election conducted more than 12 months after the commencement of the strike.

(b) In the case of elections conducted within 18 months of the effective date of this part which involve labor disputes which
 commenced prior to such effective date, the board shall have the jurisdiction to adopt fair, equitable, and appropriate eligibility rules, which shall effectuate the policies of this part, with respect to the eligibility of economic strikers who were paid for work performed or for paid vacation during the payroll period immediately preceding the expiration of a collective-bargaining agreement or the commencement of a strike; provided, however, that in no event shall the board afford eligibility to any such striker who has not performed any services for the employer during the 36-month period immediately preceding the effective date of this part.

(c) This section shall be operative January 1, 2028.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 12) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 7, Sec. 13.   (AB 113)   Effective May 15, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1157.2.

In any election where none of the choices on the ballot receives a majority, a runoff shall be conducted, the ballot providing for a selection between the two choices receiving the largest and second largest number of valid votes cast in the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1157.3.

Employers shall maintain accurate and current payroll lists containing the names and addresses of all their employees, and shall make such lists available to the board upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1158.

Whenever an order of the board made pursuant to Section 1160.3 is based in whole or in part upon the facts certified following an investigation pursuant to Sections 1156.3 to 1157.2, inclusive, and there is a petition for review of the order, the certification and the record of
 the investigation shall be included in the transcript of the entire record required to be filed under Section 1160.8 and thereupon the decree of the court enforcing, modifying, or setting aside in whole or in part the order of the board shall be made and entered upon the pleadings, testimony, and proceedings set forth in the transcript. The filing of a petition for review described in this section shall not be grounds for a stay of proceedings conducted pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 1164).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 697, Sec. 2.   (SB 126)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1159.

In order to assure the full freedom of association, self-organization, and designation of representatives of the employees own choosing, only labor organizations certified pursuant to this part shall be parties to a legally valid collective-bargaining agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Prevention of Unfair Labor Practices and Judicial Review and Enforcement [1160. - 1162.]

1160.

The board is empowered, as provided in this chapter, to prevent any person from engaging in any unfair labor practice, as set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1153) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1160.2.

Whenever it is charged that any person has engaged in or is engaging in any such unfair labor practice, the board, or any agent or agency designated by the board for such purposes, shall have power to issue and cause to be served upon such person a complaint stating the charges in that respect, and containing a notice of hearing before the board or a member thereof, or before a designated agency or agencies, at a place therein fixed, not less than five days after the serving of such complaint. No complaint shall issue based upon any unfair labor practice occurring more than six months prior to the filing of the charge with the board and the service of a copy thereof upon the person against whom such charge is made, unless the person aggrieved thereby was prevented from filing such charge by reason of service in the armed forces, in which event the six-month period shall be computed from the day of his discharge. Any such complaint may be amended by the member, agent, or agency conducting the hearing, or the board in its discretion, at any time prior to the issuance of an order based thereon. The person so complained against shall have the right to file an answer to the original or amended complaint and to appear in person or otherwise and give testimony at the place and time fixed in the complaint. In the discretion of the member, agent, or agency conducting the hearing or the board, any other person may be allowed to intervene in the proceeding and to present testimony. Any such proceeding shall, so far as practicable, be conducted in accordance with the Evidence Code. All proceedings shall be appropriately reported.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1160.3.

The testimony taken by such member, agent, or agency, or the board in such hearing shall be reduced to writing and filed with the board. Thereafter, in its discretion, the board, upon notice, may take further testimony or hear argument. If, upon the preponderance of the testimony taken, the board shall be of the opinion that any person named in the complaint has engaged in or is engaging in any such unfair labor practice, the board shall state its findings of fact and shall issue and cause to be served on such person an order requiring such person to cease and desist from such unfair labor practice, to take affirmative action, including reinstatement of employees with or without backpay, and making employees whole, when the board deems such relief appropriate, for the loss of pay resulting from the
 employer’s refusal to bargain, and to provide such other relief as will effectuate the policies of this part. Where an order directs reinstatement of an employee, backpay may be required of the employer or labor organization, as the case may be, responsible for the discrimination suffered by the employee. Such order may further require such person to make reports from time to time showing the extent to which it has complied with the order. If, upon the preponderance of the testimony taken, the board shall be of the opinion that the person named in the complaint has not engaged in or is not engaging in any unfair labor practice, the board shall state its findings of fact and shall issue an order dismissing the complaint. No order of the board shall require the reinstatement of any individual as an employee who has been suspended or discharged, or the payment to the employee of any backpay, if such individual was suspended or discharged for cause. In case the evidence is presented before a member of the board, or before an administrative law officer thereof, such member, or such administrative law officer, as the case may be, shall issue and cause to be served on the parties to the proceedings a proposed report, together with a recommended order, which shall be filed with the board, and, if no exceptions are filed within 20 days after service thereof upon such parties, or within such further period as the board may authorize, such recommended order shall become the order of the board and become effective as therein prescribed. If exceptions have been filed and the board issues an order finding that the person named in
 the complaint has engaged in or is engaging in any unfair labor practice and directing payment of a monetary remedy, the board shall order further proceedings to determine the specific amount of the monetary remedy or, if the monetary remedy is continuing to accrue, the amount accrued as of the date of the board’s order. In these cases, the board’s order does not become final for purposes of Section 1160.8 until the board has issued its determination of the specific amount of the monetary remedy.

Until the record in a case shall have been filed in a court, as provided in this chapter, the board may, at any time upon reasonable notice and in such manner as it shall deem proper, modify or set aside, in whole or in part, any finding or order made or issued by it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 7, Sec. 14.   (AB 113)   Effective May 15, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1160.4.

(a) The board may, upon finding reasonable cause to believe that any person has engaged in or is engaging in an unfair labor practice,
 petition the superior court in any county wherein the unfair labor practice in question is alleged to have occurred, or wherein
 the
 person resides or transacts business, for appropriate temporary relief or restraining order. Upon the filing of the petition, the board shall cause notice thereof to be served upon the person, and thereupon the court shall have jurisdiction to grant to the board such temporary relief or restraining order as the court deems just and proper.

(b) (1) In addition to any harm resulting directly from an adverse employment action or other allegedly unlawful action, the court shall
 consider the indirect effect upon protected rights of all agricultural employees of the employer in determining whether temporary relief or a restraining order is just and proper.

(2) When the alleged unfair labor practice is such that, by its nature, it would interfere with the free choice of employees to choose or not choose an exclusive bargaining representative, appropriate temporary relief or a restraining order shall issue on a showing that reasonable cause exists to believe that the unfair labor practice has occurred. The order shall remain in effect until an election has been held or for 30 days, whichever occurs first. Thereafter, a preliminary injunction may issue if it is shown to be just and proper.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 916 of the Code of Civil Procedure, temporary relief or restraining orders granted pursuant to this section shall not be stayed pending appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 697, Sec. 3.   (SB 126)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1160.5.

Whenever it is charged that any person has engaged in an unfair labor practice within the meaning of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 1154, the board is empowered and directed to hear and determine the dispute out of which such unfair labor practice shall have arisen, unless within 10 days after notice that such charge has been filed, the parties to such dispute submit to the board satisfactory evidence that they have adjusted, or agreed upon methods for the voluntary adjustment of the dispute. Upon compliance by the parties to the dispute with the decision of the board or upon such voluntary adjustment of the dispute, such charge shall be dismissed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1160.6.

Whenever it is charged that any person has engaged in an unfair labor practice within the meaning of paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (d), or of subdivision (g), of Section 1154, or of Section 1155, the preliminary investigation of such charge shall be made forthwith and given priority over all other cases except cases of like character in the office where it is filed or to which it is referred. If, after such investigation, the officer or regional attorney to whom the matter may be referred has reasonable cause to believe such charge is true and that a complaint should issue, he shall, on behalf of the board, petition the superior court in the county in which the unfair labor practice in question has occurred, is alleged to have occurred, or where the person alleged to have committed the unfair labor practice resides or transacts business, for appropriate injunctive relief pending the final adjudication of the board with respect to the matter. The officer or regional attorney shall make all reasonable efforts to advise the party against whom the restraining order is sought of his intention to seek such order at least 24 hours prior to doing so. In the event the officer or regional attorney has been unable to advise such party of his intent at least 24 hours in advance, he shall submit a declaration to the court under penalty of perjury setting forth in detail the efforts he has made. Upon the filing of any such petition, the superior court shall have jurisdiction to grant such injunctive relief or temporary restraining order as it deems just and proper. Upon the filing of any such petition, the board shall cause notice thereof to be served upon any person involved in the charge and such person, including the charging party, shall be given an opportunity to appear by counsel and present any relevant testimony. For the purposes of this section, the superior court shall be deemed to have jurisdiction of a labor organization either in the county in which such organization maintains its principal office, or in any county in which its duly authorized officers or agents are engaged in promoting or protecting the interests of employee members. The service of legal process upon such officer or agent shall constitute service upon the labor organization and make such organization a party to the suit. In situations where such relief is appropriate, the procedure specified herein shall apply to charges with respect to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 1154.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1160.7.

Whenever it is charged that any person has engaged in an unfair labor practice within the meaning of subdivision (c) of Section 1153 or subdivision (b) of Section 1154, such charge shall be given priority over all other cases except cases of like character in the office where it is filed or to which it is referred and cases given priority under Section 1160.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1160.8.

Any person aggrieved by the final order of the board granting or denying in whole or in part the relief sought may obtain a review of such order in the court of appeal having jurisdiction over the county wherein the unfair labor practice in question was alleged to have been engaged in, or wherein such person resides or transacts business, by filing in such court a written petition requesting that the order of the board be modified or set aside. Such petition shall be filed with the court within 30 days from the date of the issuance of the board’s order. Upon the filing of such petition, the court shall cause notice to be served upon the board and thereupon shall have jurisdiction of the proceeding. The board shall file in the court the record of the proceeding, certified by the board within 10 days after the clerk’s notice unless such time is extended by the court for good cause shown. The court shall have jurisdiction to grant to the board such temporary relief or restraining order it deems just and proper and in like manner to make and enter a decree enforcing, modifying and enforcing as so modified, or setting aside in whole or in part, the order of the board. The findings of the board with respect to questions of fact if supported by substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole shall in like manner be conclusive.

An order directing an election shall not be stayed pending review, but such order may be reviewed as provided in Section 1158.

If the time for review of the board order has lapsed, and the person has not voluntarily complied with the board’s order, the board may apply to the superior court in any county in which the unfair labor practice occurred or wherein such person resides or transacts business for enforcement of its order. If after hearing, the court determines that the order was issued pursuant to procedures established by the board and that the person refuses to comply with the order, the court shall enforce such order by writ of injunction or other proper process. The court shall not review the merits of the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1160.9.

The procedures set forth in this chapter shall be the exclusive method of redressing unfair labor practices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1160.10.

(a) (1) Any employer who commits an unfair labor practice shall, in addition to any remedy ordered by the board, be subject to a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation. 

(2) In cases involving violations of subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 1153, or involving any violation of Section 1153 that results in the discharge of an employee or other serious economic harm to an employee, the board shall double the amount of the penalty to an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). 

(b) In determining the amount of any civil
 penalty to be imposed under this section, the board shall consider the following:

(1) The gravity of the unfair labor practice.

(2) The impact of the unfair labor practice on the charging party, on other persons seeking to exercise rights guaranteed by this part, and on the public interest.

(3) The financial circumstances of the employer.

(c) If the board determines, based on the particular facts and circumstances of a case, that imposing personal liability on a director or officer of an employer, a civil penalty pursuant to this section may also be assessed against a director or officer of the employer who directed or committed the violation, had established a
 policy that led to the violation, or had actual or constructive knowledge of, and the authority to prevent, the violation and failed to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 673, Sec. 4.   (AB 2183)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1160.11.

(a) An employer who petitions for a writ of review of a final board order in the court of appeal or the California Supreme Court pursuant to Section 1160.8, or who otherwise appeals, petitions, or seeks to overturn or stay or modify any order of the board in which the board has ordered the payment of a monetary remedy shall first post a bond with the board in the amount of the entire economic value of the order as determined by the board as a condition to filing a petition for a writ of review or other court filing to ensure that employees receive the benefits of the order if the employer seeking review does not prevail. The employer shall post the bond with the board within 30 days from the date of the issuance of the board’s order. The court shall dismiss any petition for a writ of review or other
 legal challenge where the petitioning employer did not timely comply with this section.

(b) The bond required under this section shall consist of an appeal bond issued by a licensed surety or a cash deposit with the board in the amount specified in subdivision (a) of this section. The employer shall provide written notification to all of the parties of the posting of the bond and shall also provide notice to the court at the time of the filing of the petition for a writ of review or other court filing. The bond shall be on the condition that, if the petition or other court filing is withdrawn, dismissed, or denied or if judgment is otherwise entered against the employer, the employer shall pay the amount owed pursuant to the board’s order, or the judgment of the court if in a different amount, unless the parties have executed a settlement agreement for payment of some other amount, in which case the employer shall pay the amount the employer is
 obligated to pay under the terms of the settlement agreement. If the employer fails to pay the amount owed within 10 days of finality of the review proceeding or the execution of a settlement agreement, a portion of the bond equal to the amount owed, or the entire bond if the amount owed exceeds the bond, is forfeited to the board for appropriate distribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 7, Sec. 15.   (AB 113)   Effective May 15, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1161.

(a) The Agricultural Employee Relief Fund is hereby created as a special fund in the State Treasury and is continuously appropriated to the Agricultural Labor Relations Board for the purposes specified in subdivision (c). The board shall act as a trustee of all moneys deposited in the fund.

(b) Any monetary relief ordered by the board pursuant to this part to be paid by an employer to an employee shall be collected by the board on behalf of the employee. All monetary relief so collected by the board shall be remitted to the employee for whom the board collected the money.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding Section 1519 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if the board has made a diligent effort to locate an employee on whose behalf the board has collected monetary relief pursuant to this part, and is unable to locate the employee or the lawful representative of the employee for a period of two years after the date the board collected the monetary relief, the board shall deposit those moneys in the fund.

(2) Moneys in the fund shall be used by the board to pay employees the unpaid balance of any monetary relief ordered by the board to be paid by an employer to an employee. Prior to making any payment from the fund, the board first shall make a finding that, in an individual case, the collection of the full amount of the monetary relief ordered is not possible after reasonable efforts have been made to collect the balance from the employer.

(d) As used in this section, “fund” means the Agricultural Employee Relief Fund.

(e) On or before July 1, 2002, the board shall report to the Legislature on the status of the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 160.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1162.

(a) An employer who petitions for a writ of review in a court of appeal or the California Supreme Court or otherwise appeals, petitions, or seeks to overturn or stay or modify any order of the board under this part involving make-whole, backpay, or other monetary award or economic benefit to employees or a labor organization shall, as a condition to seeking review, appeal, modification, or stay, post a bond, in the amount of the entire economic value of the order as determined by
 the board, to ensure that employees or the labor organization receive the benefits of the order if the employer does not prevail.

(b) The bond shall consist of an appeal bond issued by a licensed surety or a cash deposit with the board in the amount of the order, decision, or award. The employer shall provide written notification to all of the parties of the posting of the bond. The bond shall be on the condition that, if any judgment is entered against the employer, the employer shall pay the amount owed pursuant to the judgment, and if the appeal, petition, or action is withdrawn or dismissed without entry of judgment, the employer shall pay the amount owed pursuant to the order, decision, or award of the board unless the parties have executed a settlement agreement for payment of some other amount, in which case the employer shall pay
 the amount that the employer is obligated to pay under the terms of the settlement agreement. If the employer fails to pay the amount owed within 10 days of entry of the judgment, dismissal, or withdrawal of the appeal, or the execution of a settlement agreement, the bond is forfeited to the employee or employees or labor organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 673, Sec. 5.   (AB 2183)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. Contract Dispute Resolution [1164. - 1164.13.]

1164.

(a) An agricultural employer or a labor organization certified as the exclusive bargaining agent of a bargaining unit of agricultural employees may file with the board, at any time following (1) 90 days after a renewed demand to bargain by an agricultural employer or a labor organization certified prior to January 1, 2003, which meets the conditions specified in Section 1164.11, (2) 90 days after an initial request to bargain by an agricultural employer or a labor organization certified after January 1, 2003, (3) 60 days after the board has certified the labor organization pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 1156.3, or (4) 60 days after the board has dismissed a decertification petition upon a finding that the employer has unlawfully initiated, supported, sponsored, or assisted in the filing of a decertification petition a
 declaration that the parties have failed to reach a collective bargaining agreement and a request that the board issue an order directing the parties to mandatory mediation and conciliation of their issues. “Agricultural employer,” for purposes of this chapter, means an agricultural employer, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1140.4, who has employed or engaged 25 or more agricultural employees during any calendar week in the year preceding the filing of a declaration pursuant to this subdivision.

(b) Upon receipt of a declaration pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall immediately issue an order directing the parties to mandatory mediation and conciliation of their issues. The board shall request from the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service a list of nine mediators who have experience in labor mediation. The California State Mediation and Conciliation Service may include names chosen from its own mediators, or from
 a list of names supplied by the American Arbitration Association or the Federal Mediation Service. The parties shall select a mediator from the list within seven days of receipt of the list. If the parties cannot agree on a mediator, they shall strike names from the list until a mediator is chosen by process of elimination. If a party refuses to participate in selecting a mediator, the other party may choose a mediator from the list. The costs of mediation and conciliation shall be borne equally by the parties.
